Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3323
Termination of proceedings for creation or change of district by protest; effect.

If the proceedings for the creation of an original offstreet parking district or for an offstreet parking district under which the boundaries have been changed, are terminated by a protest to the city council, a proceeding under the Offstreet Parking District Act for the same or substantially the same acquisition and improvement shall not be commenced within one year thereafter, except on petitions signed by owners of the record title representing a majority of the total land area in the district.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 23, p. 208;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-834;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 23, p. 449;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 202.